src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/pronouns_gt-norm.yaml
  Pronoun - makkir: # interrogativ
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: makkir
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: makkira
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: makkirav
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: makkirin
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: makkirij
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: makkiris
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: makkirijn
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: makkira
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: makkirij
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: makkirijt
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: makkirijn
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: makkirijda
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: makkirijs
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: makkirij
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Ess: makkirin

  Pronoun - galla: # interrogativ
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: galla
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: galle
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: gallev
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: gallen
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: galláj
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: galles
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: gallijn
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: galle
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: gallij
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: gallijt
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: gallijn
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: gallijda
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: gallijs
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: gallij

  Pronoun - guhtimusj: # interrogativ
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: guhtimusj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: guhtimuttja
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: guhtimuttjav
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: guhtimuttjan
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: guhtimudtjaj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: guhtimuttjas
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: guhtimuttjajn
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: guhtimuttja
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: guhtimuttjaj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: guhtimuttjajt
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: guhtimuttjajn
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: guhtimuttjajda
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: guhtimuttjajs
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: guhtimuttjaj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Ess: guhtimudtjan

  Pronoun - goabbá: # relative
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: goabbá
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: goappá
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: goappáv
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine: goappán
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: goabbáj
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela: goappás
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: goappájn
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: goappá
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: goappáj
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: goappájt
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine: goappájn
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: goappájda
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela: goappájs
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: goappáj

  Pronoun - goappásj: # relative
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: goappásj
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: goappátja
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: goappátjav
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: goappátjin
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: goappátjij
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: goappátjis
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: goappátjijn
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: goappátja
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: goappátjij
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: goappátjijt
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: goappátjijn
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: goappátjijda
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: goappátjijs
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: goappátjij

  Pronoun - goappátjagá: # Indefinite
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: goappátjagá
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: goappátjagáj
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: goappátjagájt
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: goappátjagájn
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: goappátjagájda
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: goappátjagájs
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: goappátjagáj

  Pronoun - goabbák: # Indef
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-k: goabbák
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Foc/Pos-k: goabbák
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k: goappák
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k: goappák
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-k: goappák
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Foc/Pos-k: goappák
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine+Foc/Neg-k: goappánik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine+Foc/Pos-k: goappánik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-k: goabbásik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill+Foc/Pos-k: goabbásik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela+Foc/Neg-k: goappástik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela+Foc/Pos-k: goappástik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-k: goappájnik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com+Foc/Pos-k: goappájnik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ess+Foc/Neg-k: goabbánik
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ess+Foc/Pos-k: goabbánik

  Pronoun - gájkka: # Indefinitive
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: gájkka
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: gájka
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [gájkav, gájkka]
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: gájkan
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: gájkkaj
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: gájkas
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: gájkajn
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: gájka
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: gájkaj
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: gájkajt
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: gájkajn
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: gájkajda
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: gájkajs
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: gájkaj
    gájkka+Pron+Indef+Ess: gájkkan

  Pronoun - mige: # Indefinitive
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: [mige, migek]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: [maŋga, maŋgak, maŋge]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [mavga, mavgak]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: [mannak, mannanik]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: [masik, masisik]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: [masstak, masstastik]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: [majnak, majnanik, majnek]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: [mahkka, mahkkak]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: [majgak, majga]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: [majdik, mejdik, mejdek, majdek, majdak]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: [majnak, majnajnik]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: []
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: [majstak, majstajstik]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: [majga, majgak]
    mige+Pron+Indef+Ess: [mannak, manenik]

  Pronoun - nágin: # Indefinitive
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: nágin
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: nágina
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: náginav
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: náginin
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: náginij
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: náginis
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: náginijn
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: nágina
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: náginij
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: náginijt
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: náginijn
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: náginijda
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: náginijs
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: náginij
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Ess: náginin

  Pronoun - aktak: # Indefinitive
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Foc/Pos-k: aktak   
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-k: aktak
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k: [avtak, åvtåk]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k: [avtak, åvtåk]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Foc/Pos-k: [avtak, åvtåk]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-k: [avtak, åvtåk]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+Foc/Pos-k: [avtanik, åvtånik]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+Foc/Neg-k: [avtanik, åvtånik]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+Foc/Pos-k: aktasik
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-k: aktasik
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+Foc/Pos-k: [avtastik, åvtåstik]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+Foc/Neg-k: [avtastik, åvtåstik]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+Foc/Pos-k: [avtajnik, åvtåjnik]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-k: [avtajnik, åvtåjnik]
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ess+Foc/Pos-k: aktanik
    akta+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ess+Foc/Neg-k: aktanik

  Pronoun - færtguhtik: # Indefinitive
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Foc/Pos-k: [færtguhtik, färtguhtik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-k: [færtguhtik, färtguhtik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgeŋga, färtgeŋga, færtgeŋgak, färtgeŋgak, færtgeŋge, färtgeŋge]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgeŋga, färtgeŋga, færtgeŋgak, färtgeŋgak, færtgeŋge, färtgeŋge]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgevga, färtgevga, færtgevgak, färtgevgak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgevga, färtgevga, færtgevgak, färtgevgak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgænnanik, färtgännanik, färtgännak, færtgænnak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgænnanik, färtgännanik, färtgännak, færtgænnak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgesik, färtgesik, färtgesisik, færtgesisik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgesik, färtgesik, färtgesisik, færtgesisik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgæsstastik, färtgässtastik, færtgæsstak, färtgässtak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgæsstastik, färtgässtastik, færtgæsstak, färtgässtak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejnak, färtgejnak, færtgejnanik, färtgejnanik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejnak, färtgejnak, færtgejnanik, färtgejnanik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgudik, färtgudik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgudik, färtgudik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejga, färtgejga, færtgejgak, färtgejgak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejga, färtgejga, færtgejgak, färtgejgak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejdak, färtgejdak, färtgejdik, færtgejdik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejdak, färtgejdak, färtgejdik, færtgejdik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejnak, färtgejnak, færtgejnajnik, färtgejnajnik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejnak, färtgejnak, færtgejnajnik, färtgejnajnik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejdak, färtgejdak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejdak, färtgejdak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejstak, färtgejstak, færtgejstajstik, färtgejstajstik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejstak, färtgejstak, færtgejstajstik, färtgejstajstik]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+Foc/Pos-k: [færtgejga, färtgejga, færtgejgak, färtgejgak]
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+Foc/Neg-k: [færtgejga, färtgejga, færtgejgak, färtgejgak]

  Pronoun - juoga: # Indefinitive
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juoga
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: juoŋga
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: juojddá
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: [juonná, juonne]
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: juosik
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: juosstá
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: juojnak
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: juojddájt
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Ess: juonen

  Pronoun - ålos: # Indefinitive
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: ålos
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: ållusa
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: ållusij
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: ållusijt
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: ållusijn
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: ållusijda
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: ållusijs
    ålos+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: ållusij

  Pronoun - soames: # Indefinitive
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: soames
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: soabmása
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: soabmásav
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: soabmásin
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: soabmásij
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: soabmásis
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: soabmásijn
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: soabmása
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: soabmásij
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: soabmásijt
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: soabmásijn
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: soabmásijda
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: soabmásijs
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: soabmásij

  Pronoun - ietjá: # Indefinitive
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: ietjá
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: iehtjáda
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: iehtjádav
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: iehtjádin
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: iehtjádij
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: iehtjádis
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: iehtjádijn
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: iehtjáda
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: iehtjádij
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: iehtjádijt
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: iehtjádijn
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: iehtjádijda
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: iehtjádijs
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: iehtjádij
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Ess: iehtjádin
